Arkansas, session 2025, HB1978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-17-1113(i), concerning the Seventeenth
District composed of the counties of Clay and Greene, is amended to read as
follows:
(i)(1) The Seventeenth District is composed of the counties of Clay
and Greene.
(2) The Seventeenth District has five (5) departments as
follows:
(A) One (1) located in Paragould;
(B) One (1) located in Marmaduke;
(C) One (1) located in Corning;
(D) One (1) located in Piggott; and
(E) One (1) located in Rector.
(3) The Seventeenth District is served by one (1) two (2) state
district court judge judges.
(4) The Seventeenth District judge is judges are elected
districtwide.
*MBM225*
04/02/2025 5:38:34 PM MBM225

HB1978
(5) The Seventeenth District court has districtwide
jurisdiction.
(6)(A) One (1) of the state district court judges under this
section shall have salary and benefits paid as provided under § 16-17-1106.
(B) In lieu of § 16-17-1106, one (1) of the state district
court judges under this section shall have salary and benefits paid as
follows:
(i) The state shall pay the salary and benefits of
the state district court judge;
(ii) The funds necessary to cover the salary and
benefits of the state district court judge, including without limitation
retirement benefits, shall be divided between the City of Paragould, Greene
County, and Clay County, with the City of Paragould paying one-half (1/2) of
seventy-five percent (75%) of the salary and benefits, Greene County paying
one-half (1/2) of seventy-five percent (75%) of the salary and benefits, and
Clay County paying twenty-five percent (25%) of the salary and benefits; and
(iii) On or before January 15 of each year, the sum
under subdivision (i)(6)(B)(ii) of this section to fund the salary and
benefits of the state district court judge shall be remitted to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section for deposit into the Constitutional
Officers Fund.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. IMPLEMENTATION OF NEW STATE DISTRICT COURT
JUDGESHIP. The new state district court judgeship created by this act shall
become effective January 1, 2027, and shall be placed on the ballot to be
elected at the 2026 nonpartisan judicial election.










04/02/2025 5:38:34 PM MBM225